Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0273

"Punchboards," "pull-tabs."

"Punchboards" and "pull-tabs," as used in this chapter, shall be given their usual and ordinary meaning as of July 16, 1973, except that such definition may be revised by the commission pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1987 c 4 s 19. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(18).]